Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB615.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8812(b)(1) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 8812. Exemptions from taxation.(a) General rule.--The following property shall be exempt from all county, city, borough, town, township, road, poor, county institution district and school real estate taxes:* * *(16) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) or any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, all veterans' organizations known as Veterans of Foreign Wars and the American Legion which are founded, endowed and maintained by public or private charity, together with the grounds 123456789101112131415161718 annexed and necessary for the occupancy and use of the veterans' organizations, and social halls and grounds owned and occupied by the veterans' organizations and used on a regular basis for activities which contribute to the support of the veterans' organizations, as long as the net receipts from the activities are used solely for the charitable purposes of the veterans' organizations.(b) Exceptions.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a)(13) [and], (15) and (16), all property, real or personal, other than that which is actually and regularly used and occupied for the purposes specified in this section, and all property from which any income or revenue is derived, other than from recipients of the bounty of the institution or charity, shall be subject to taxation, except where exempted by law for State purposes.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0615PN0626 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718